lb_LU.aff
FLAG long
SFX z0 Y 30
SFX z0 0 fach [^n]
SFX z0 0 t [^t]
SFX z0 0 ten [^tn]
SFX z0 0 tens [^tn]
SFX z0 0 te [^tn]
SFX z0 0 anzwanzeg .
SFX z0 0 andrësseg .
SFX z0 0 avéierzeg .
SFX z0 0 afofzeg .
SFX z0 0 asiechzeg .
SFX z0 0 asiwwenzeg .
SFX z0 0 anachzeg .
SFX z0 0 annonzeg .
SFX z0 0 anzwanzeg .
SFX z0 0 mol [^n]
SFX z0 n mol n
SFX z0 0 anzwanzegmol .
SFX z0 0 andrëssegmol .
SFX z0 0 avéierzegmol .
SFX z0 0 afofzegmol .
SFX z0 0 asiechzegmol .
SFX z0 0 asiwwenzegmol .
SFX z0 0 anachzegmol .
SFX z0 0 annonzegmol .
SFX z0 0 anzwanzegmol .
SFX z0 n fach n
SFX z0 0 en/f0 t
SFX z0 0 ens t
SFX z0 0 ten/f0 wen
SFX z0 0 tens wen

PFX Z0 Y 9
PFX Z0 0 honnert .
PFX Z0 0 zweehonnert .
PFX Z0 0 dräihonnert .
PFX Z0 0 véierhonnert .
PFX Z0 0 fënnefhonnert .
PFX Z0 0 sechshonnert .
PFX Z0 0 siwenhonnert .
PFX Z0 0 aachthonnert .
PFX Z0 0 nénghonnert .

SFX h0 N 4
SFX h0 0 honnert .
SFX h0 0 eckeg .
SFX h0 0 honnertmol .
SFX h0 0 honnertfach .

PFX C0 N 4
PFX C0 A Äp Ap is:plural
PFX C0 Aa Äe Aar is:plural
PFX C0 Aa Ä Aas is:plural
PFX C0 A Ä Ab is:plural

PFX H0 N 2
PFX H0 U I/f0 U is:plural
PFX H0 Aa Ee Aasch is:plural

SFX D0 N 14
SFX D0 fchen wercher fchen is:plural
SFX D0 tchen dercher [^i]tchen is:plural
SFX D0 sschen sercher sschen is:plural
SFX D0 dchen tercher edchen is:plural
SFX D0 dchen lercher ildchen is:plural
SFX D0 dchen nercher ndchen is:plural
SFX D0 dchen tercher ëldchen is:plural
SFX D0 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX D0 enchen ngercher eenchen is:plural
SFX D0 itchen tercher iitchen is:plural
SFX D0 tchen dercher [^i]itchen is:plural
SFX D0 odchen dercher odchen is:plural
SFX D0 opchen percher opchen is:plural
SFX D0 omchen mercher omchen is:plural

SFX K0 N 3
SFX K0 0 chen/d0 [^r] is:diminutive is:singular
SFX K0 0 chen/d0 [^ä]r is:diminutive is:singular
SFX K0 r erchen/d0 är is:diminutive is:singular

SFX L0 N 1
SFX L0 0 chen/r0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX T0 N 67
SFX T0 and ëndchen/D0 [Kk]and is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ond ëndchen/D0 ond is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 and ändchen/D0 [BbHhLl]and is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aart äertchen/d0 aart is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ouf éifchen/D0 ouf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ouss éisschen/D0 ouss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 out éitchen/D0 out is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 all ällchen/d0 all is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oft ëftchen/d0 oft is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oun éinchen/d0 oun is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ot éitchen/d0 ot is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 app äppchen/d0 app is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ak äckelchen/r0 ak is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 allem ällemchen/r0 allem is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 antel äntelchen/r0 antel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aach ächelchen/r0 aach is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ack äckelchen/r0 ack is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 am ämmchen/d0 lam is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 atz ätzelchen/r0 atz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 az ätzelchen/r0 [Ss]az is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ommel ëmmelchen/r0 ommel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 allef ällefchen/r0 allef is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 auch äichelchen/r0 auch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ock éckchen/d0 ock is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oup éipchen/d0 oup is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ox éxelchen/r0 ox is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 amm ämmchen/d0 amm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 auscht äischtchen/d0 auscht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ous éischen/d0 ous is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aass ässchen/d0 aass is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ascht äschtchen/d0 ascht is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ochs échschen/d0 ochs is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 anger éngerchen/r0 anger is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 orm ërmchen/d0 orm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 omper ëmperchen/r0 omper is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ann ännchen/d0 ann is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oer eeërchen/r0 oer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aff äffchen/d0 aff is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 als älschen/d0 als is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ollef ëllefchen/r0 ollef is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 onken énkchen/d0 onken is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 offer ëfferchen/r0 offer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 amp ämmchen/d0 amp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 an ännchen/d0 an is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 auz äizchen/d0 auz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 omp ëmpchen/d0 omp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oppel ëppelchen/r0 oppel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ondel ëndelchen/r0 ondel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ouer éierchen/r0 ouer is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ossel ësselchen/r0 ossel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aufel äifelchen/r0 aufel is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ach ächelchen/r0 [^a]ach is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 az ätzchen/d0 [Kk]az is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oul éilchen/d0 oul is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 aarf äerfchen/D0 aarf is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 a ächen/d0 a is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 anz änzelchen/r0 [Pp]anz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ong éngelchen/r0 ong is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 osch ëschelchen/r0 osch is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 opp ëppchen/d0 opp is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 onn ënnchen/d0 onn is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oss ësschen/d0 oss is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 omm ëmmchen/d0 omm is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 anz änzchen/d0 [lr]anz is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 ong éngchen/d0 hong is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 äin éngchen/d0 äin is:diminutive is:singular
SFX T0 oll ëllchen/d0 oll is:diminutive is:singular

SFX O0 N 1
SFX O0 0 chen/D0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX S0 N 1
SFX S0 en chen/d0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX X0 N 1
SFX X0 0 elchen/r0 . is:diminutive is:singular

SFX F7 N 4
SFX F7 en 0 . is:feminine is:singular
SFX F7 en 0 . is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX F7 n r . is:feminine is:singular is:plural
SFX F7 nen 0 [^n]nen is:feminine is:singular is:plural

SFX q0 N 4
SFX q0 n 0 . is:eifeler
SFX q0 n r . is:plural
SFX q0 en 0 . is:plural
SFX q0 nen 0 [^n]nen is:plural

SFX w0 N 3
SFX w0 n 0 .
SFX w0 en t [^t]en
SFX w0 en 0 ten

SFX F1 N 1
SFX F1 r se/N0 . is:feminine is:singular

SFX F2 N 1
SFX F2 er ère/N0 . is:feminine is:singular

SFX F3 N 1
SFX F3 eur rice/N0 . is:feminine is:singular

SFX F4 N 2
SFX F4 eur orin/n2 eur is:feminine is:singular
SFX F4 er orin/n2 er is:feminine is:singular

SFX F5 N 3
SFX F5 e in/n2 e is:feminine is:singular
SFX F5 en in/n2 en is:feminine is:singular
SFX F5 er in/n2 er is:feminine is:singular

SFX F8 N 3
SFX F8 0 e/E0 [^n] is:feminine is:singular
SFX F8 0 ne/N0 [^i]n is:feminine is:singular
SFX F8 0 e/E0 in is:feminine is:singular

SFX t1 N 3
SFX t1 0 ien/f0 [^l][glpz] is:plural
SFX t1 0 ten/f0 u is:plural
SFX t1 0 jen/f0 ll is:plural
