lb_LU.dic
aacht/z0Z0h0
Aarm/C0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aarsch/C0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aasch/H0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Aascht/C0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Abt/C0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Apel/C0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ausbau/t1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ausfaseren/w0s0 po:verb
Bankeclient/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Banquier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Behënnerten/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Bild/u0O0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Botzlomp/n0T0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Botzmaterial/R0t1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Braconnier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Buchillustrateur/n0F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Cargoschëff/R0K0X0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Chercheur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Coequipier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Colasfläsch/n0X0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Conjoint/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Consommateur/n0F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Coproprietaire/N0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Däiwel/n0L0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Demineur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Dëppen/f0S0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Diamantesteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
dimmeren/G0w0 po:verb
Dokterkoppel/n0T0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Doudegen/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
dräi/z0Z0h0
Dréibuchauteur/n0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
drësseg/a0Z0 po:adjective
een/f0z0Z0h0
ëmfléissen/w0s0 po:verb
Endclient/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Epicier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
erareenen/w0s0 po:verb
Exportateur/n0F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Faarfdëppen/f0S0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
fënnef/z0Z0h0
Fëschstiefchen/D0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Fierkel/n0L0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
fiselen/w0 po:verb
Fixfeierkëscht/n0K0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Flaggschëff/R0K0X0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Flüchtlingsfamill/n0t1 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
fofzeg/A0a0Z0 po:adjective
Fonctionnaire/N0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Fournisseur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Friddensgarant/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Galesteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gänseféisschen/D0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gefaangenen/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Geschichtsprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Gittarspill/R0K0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Haifësch/X0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Héichseelgaart/e0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Heizdecken/f0S0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Holzwierfel/n0L0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hotelier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Hunnegdëppen/f0S0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Inhaftéierten/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Internetspill/R0K0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
iwwersaieren/w0 po:verb
Jugendanimateur/n0F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kënnegungsbréif/u0t0O0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Knäipziedel/n0L0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kopéierer/F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Kottengsrack/e0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Latäinprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Leeschtungsprinzip/R0t1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Leschtgenannten/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Limonadsfläsch/n0X0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Maquilleur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Margréitchen/D0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Mathesprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Mëllechdëppen/f0S0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Mineralwaasserfläsch/n0X0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Munitiounskëscht/n0K0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Museksfrënd/F6O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
néng/z0Z0h0
Nonnëfascht/e0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
nonzéng/Z0
Ouerestiefchen/D0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Parteifonctionnaire/N0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Partikel/n0L0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Patissier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Plastiksdëppen/f0S0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Pornoacteur/n0F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Portosfläsch/n0X0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Privatinvestisseur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Protegé/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Regleur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Réibau/t1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Ressortschäffen/f0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Romanauteur/n0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
ronderëmspigelen/w0s0 po:verb
Säitefënster/n0L0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schachspill/R0K0 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Schläifsteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schnéidecken/f0S0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Schnéimann/u0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Schwéierblesséierten/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
sechs/z0Z0h0
siwen/f0z0Z0h0
Steierenquêteur/n0F1F3 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Tapezéierer/F0F5 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Teinturier/n0F2 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Thermosfläsch/n0X0 po:noun ts:feminine_singular
Tounmaterial/R0t1 po:noun ts:neutral_singular
Traiteur/n0F1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Uewen/f0H0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Unisprofesser/n0F0F4 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
véier/z0Z0h0
Vermëssten/F7q0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
verraschten/w0 po:verb
Vizechampion/n0F8 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wäin/R0T0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wanterstiwwel/n0L0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Wattstiefchen/D0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Witz/n0R0K0 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
Zännsteen/O0e1 po:noun ts:masculine_singular
zwanzeg/Z0
zwee/z0Z0h0
